Washington statutes.
RCW 43.105.907

Transfer of certain powers, duties, and functions of the department of information services.

(1) Those powers, duties, and functions of the department of information services being transferred to the *consolidated technology services agency as set forth in **sections 801 through 816, chapter 43, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess. are hereby transferred to the *consolidated technology services agency.

(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the department of information services shall be delivered to the custody of the *consolidated technology services agency. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the department of information services shall be made available to the *consolidated technology services agency. All funds, credits, or other assets held by the department of information services shall be assigned to the *consolidated technology services agency.

(b) Any appropriations made to the department of information services shall, on October 1, 2011, be transferred and credited to the *consolidated technology services agency.

(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All rules and all pending business before the department of information services pertaining to the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the *consolidated technology services agency. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the *consolidated technology services agency.

(4) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the department of information services shall not affect the validity of any act performed before October 1, 2011.

(5) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

(6) All employees of the department of information services engaged in performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred to the *consolidated technology services agency are transferred to the *consolidated technology services agency. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the *consolidated technology services agency to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service law.

(7) Unless or until modified by the public employment relations commission pursuant to RCW 41.80.911:

(a) The portions of the bargaining units of employees at the department of information services existing on October 1, 2011, shall be considered appropriate units at the *consolidated technology services agency and will be so certified by the public employment relations commission.

(b) The exclusive bargaining representatives recognized as representing the portions of the bargaining units of employees at the department of information services existing on October 1, 2011, shall continue as the exclusive bargaining representatives of the transferred bargaining units without the necessity of an election.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 1009. Formerly RCW 43.41A.900.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) The "consolidated technology services agency" was renamed "Washington technology solutions" by 2024 c 545 s 4.

**(2) Sections 815 and 816, chapter 43, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess. were vetoed.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.